Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.65.010

Public printing.

All printing, binding and stationery work done for any code city shall be done within the state and all proposals, requests and invitations to submit bids, prices or contracts thereon and all contracts for such work shall so stipulate subject to the limitations contained in RCW 43.19.748 and 35.23.352.

[ 2015 c 225 s 31; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.65.010.]

NOTES: